Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.130

Issuance of license.

(1) The director shall issue a license to any applicant who meets the requirements of this chapter. The issuance of a license by the director is evidence that the person named is entitled to the rights and privileges of a licensed on-site wastewater treatment system designer as long as the license remains valid.

(2) Each person licensed under this chapter shall obtain an inking stamp, of a design authorized by the board, that contains the licensee's name and license number. Plans, specifications, and reports prepared by the registrant must be signed, dated, and stamped. Signature and stamping constitute certification by the licensee that a plan, specification, or report was prepared by or under the direct supervision of a licensee.

(3) Those persons who obtain a certificate of competency as provided in chapter 70A.105 RCW do not have the privileges granted to a license holder under this chapter and do not have authority to obtain and use a stamp as described in this section.

[ 2021 c 65 s 16; 1999 c 263 s 14.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.